Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. REGULATION OF LAND USE, STRUCTURES, BUSINESSES, AND RELATED ACTIVITIES

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL REGULATORY AUTHORITY

CHAPTER 215. MUNICIPAL REGULATION OF BUSINESSES AND OCCUPATIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. REGULATION BY MUNICIPALITIES IN GENERAL

Sec. 215.002. MOTOR VEHICLES AND ACCESSORIES. (a) A municipality by ordinance may license and otherwise regulate persons engaged primarily or incidentally in the sale or exchange of motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts or accessories within the limits of the municipality.

(b) A municipality may prescribe penalties for the violation of the ordinance.

(c) Any money collected under the ordinance may be used by the municipality only for the enforcement of the ordinance and any other laws regulating the sale, exchange, or theft of motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts or accessories.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 87(l), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 215.003. RENDERING PLANTS. To protect residents of a municipality from health hazards related to unsanitary conditions that may exist in connection with rendering plants, the municipality by ordinance may regulate the equipment and manner of operation of rendering plants located within the limits of the municipality or within one mile of the limits.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.004. TAXICABS AND LIMOUSINES. (a) To protect the public health, safety, and welfare, a municipality by ordinance:

(1) shall license, control, and otherwise regulate each private passenger vehicle, regardless of how it is propelled, that provides passenger taxicab transportation services for compensation and is designed for carrying no more than eight passengers; and

(2) may license, control, and otherwise regulate each private passenger vehicle, regardless of how it is propelled, that provides passenger limousine transportation services for compensation and is designed for carrying no more than 15 passengers.

(a-1) Subsection (a) applies to a taxicab or limousine service that is operated:

(1) within the jurisdiction of the municipality;

(2) on property owned by the municipality, singly or jointly with one or more other municipalities or public agencies;

(3) on property in which the municipality possesses an ownership interest; or

(4) by transporting from the municipality, municipal property, or property in which the municipality has an interest and returning to it.

(b) The ordinance may include:

(1) regulation of the entry into the business of providing passenger taxicab or limousine transportation services, including controls, limits, or other restrictions on the total number of persons providing the services;

(2) regulation of the rates charged for the provision of the services;

(3) establishment of safety and insurance requirements; and

(4) any other requirement adopted to ensure safe and reliable passenger transportation service.

(c) In regulating passenger taxicab or limousine transportation services under this section, a municipality is performing a governmental function. A municipality may carry out the provisions of this section to the extent the governing body of the municipality considers it necessary or appropriate.

(d) The provisions of this section relating to the regulation of limousine transportation services apply only to a municipality with a population of more than 1.9 million.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 50(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 476 (H.B. 2338), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 215.006. CHURCH PROVIDING OVERNIGHT SHELTER. (a) In this section:

(1) "Church" means a facility that is owned by a religious organization and that is used primarily for religious services.

(2) "Religious organization" means an organization that meets the standards for qualification as a religious organization under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

(b) A municipality may not adopt an ordinance, or enforce an existing ordinance, that prohibits a church from providing overnight shelter for children 17 years of age and younger.

(c) A municipal ordinance or regulation that relates to the safe and sanitary operation of a homeless shelter for children applies to a church that provides overnight shelter for children.

(d) A municipality may adopt or enforce an ordinance establishing limits on the number of nights a child may use an overnight shelter provided by a church or on the number of children that can be housed in the shelter per night.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1558), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. REGULATION BY TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 215.021. MUNICIPALITY COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a Type A general-law municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.022. BREAD. The governing body of the municipality may regulate the weight and quality of bread to be sold or used within the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.023. BUTCHERS. The governing body of the municipality may adopt any rules relating to butchers that the governing body considers necessary and proper.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.024. TANNERIES; STABLES; SLAUGHTERHOUSES; OTHER BUSINESSES. (a) As necessary for the health, comfort, and convenience of the residents of the municipality, the governing body of the municipality may compel the owner or occupant to clean, abate, or remove:

(1) a grocery;

(2) a soap, tallow, or chandler establishment;

(3) a blacksmith shop;

(4) a tannery;

(5) a stable;

(6) a slaughterhouse;

(7) a sewer;

(8) a privy;

(9) a hide house; or

(10) any other unwholesome or nauseous house or place.

(b) The governing body may direct the location of:

(1) businesses;

(2) tanneries;

(3) blacksmith shops;

(4) foundries;

(5) livery stables; and

(6) manufacturing establishments.

(c) Within the limits of a municipality, the governing body may restrain, abate, prohibit, direct the location of, or regulate the management or construction of:

(1) slaughtering establishments;

(2) hide houses;

(3) establishments for making soap;

(4) establishments for steaming or rendering lard, tallow, offal, or any other substances that may be rendered; and

(5) any other establishments or places at which any nauseous, offensive, or unwholesome business may be conducted.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.025. ANIMAL DRIVES. The governing body of the municipality may prohibit or otherwise regulate the driving of cattle, horses, or other animals in the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.026. ANIMALS AT LARGE. (a) The governing body of the municipality may establish and regulate public pounds.

(b) The governing body may prohibit or otherwise regulate the running at large of horses, mules, cattle, sheep, swine, or goats.

(c) If an animal is at large in violation of an ordinance adopted under this section, the governing body may authorize:

(1) the capture and impounding of the animal;

(2) the sale of the animal for the costs of the sale proceedings and any penalties imposed;

(3) the destruction of the animal if the animal cannot be sold; and

(4) the imposition of a penalty on the owner.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.027. BREEDING ANIMALS. The governing body of the municipality by ordinance may prohibit a person from keeping a jack, bull, or stallion in the municipality for breeding purposes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.028. MARKETS. (a) The governing body of the municipality may establish or erect markets or market houses.

(b) The governing body may designate and regulate market places and privileges and may inspect and determine the manner of inspecting meat, fish, vegetables and other produce, and any other article brought for sale at a market.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.029. DRIVERS; PORTERS. (a) The governing body of the municipality may license, tax, or otherwise regulate:

(1) cabdrivers;

(2) draymen;

(3) bus drivers;

(4) baggage wagon drivers;

(5) porters; and

(6) any other persons pursuing similar occupations with or without vehicles.

(b) The governing body may prescribe the compensation of persons subject to Subsection (a).

(c) The governing body may provide for the protection of persons subject to Subsection (a) and may make the attempt to defraud those persons of any legal charge for services rendered a misdemeanor offense.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.030. MESSENGERS. The governing body of the municipality may license, restrain, or otherwise regulate messengers for railroads, stages, or public houses.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.031. HAWKERS; PEDDLERS; PAWNBROKERS. The governing body of the municipality may license, tax, suppress, prevent, or otherwise regulate:

(1) hawkers;

(2) peddlers; and

(3) pawnbrokers.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.032. EXHIBITIONS; SHOWS; AMUSEMENTS. (a) The governing body of the municipality may license, tax, suppress, prevent, or otherwise regulate keepers of theatrical or other exhibitions, shows, or amusements.

(b) The governing body may license, tax, or otherwise regulate:

(1) theaters;

(2) circuses;

(3) exhibitions of common showmen;

(4) shows of any kind;

(5) exhibitions of natural or artificial curiosities;

(6) caravans;

(7) menageries; and

(8) musical exhibitions or performances.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.033. LICENSES; FEES. (a) The governing body of the municipality may authorize the proper municipal officer to grant and issue licenses, direct the manner of issuing and registering licenses, and set the fees to be paid for licenses.

(b) A license may not be issued for a period of more than one year.

(c) A license may not be assigned except as permitted by the governing body.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.034. SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF OCCUPATION LICENSE. (a) A judge of the municipal court, in addition to imposing a fine, may institute proceedings to suspend or revoke the license of a person if:

(1) the person is required, by law or by a municipal ordinance adopted under a law, to obtain the license from the municipality for an occupation, business, or avocation; and

(2) the judge finds the person guilty of violating a municipal ordinance relating to the occupation, business, or avocation or finds that the person has been convicted of barratry under Section 38.12, Penal Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section, a person is convicted of barratry if a court of competent jurisdiction enters an adjudication of guilt against the person regardless of whether:

(1) the sentence is subsequently probated and the person is discharged from probation;

(2) the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment is dismissed following probation; or

(3) the person is pardoned for the offense, unless the pardon is granted expressly for subsequent proof of innocence.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 723, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER C. REGULATION BY TYPE B GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 215.051. MUNICIPALITY COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a Type B general-law municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.052. MARKETS. The governing body of the municipality may establish markets.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER D. REGULATION BY HOME-RULE MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 215.071. MUNICIPALITY COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a home-rule municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.072. DAIRIES; SLAUGHTERHOUSES. The municipality may inspect dairies, slaughterhouses, or slaughter pens, in or outside the municipal limits, from which milk or meat is furnished to the residents of the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.073. VEHICLES FOR HIRE. The municipality may license, fix the charges or fares made by, or otherwise regulate any person who owns, operates, or controls any type of vehicle used on the public streets or alleys of the municipality for carrying passengers or freight for compensation.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.0735. OPERATORS OF VEHICLES. The municipality may prescribe the qualifications of an operator of a vehicle that uses the public streets in the municipality.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 215.0735 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(32), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 215.074. THEATERS; SHOWS; AMUSEMENTS. The municipality may regulate the location and conduct of:

(1) theaters;

(2) movie theaters;

(3) bowling alleys; and

(4) other places of public amusements.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 215.075. POLICE POWER. The municipality may license any lawful business or occupation that is subject to the police power of the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.